Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-603
Emergency Firefighting Fund; agreements with federal government; purpose.

The State Fire Marshal may, for the purpose of maintaining a fire patrol in any timber, brush, grass, or other flammable vegetation or material, enter into cooperative agreements with the federal government under such terms as he deems advisable and may renew, revise and terminate such agreements. The expenses incurred under such agreements shall be paid from the Emergency Firefighting Fund or funds available for wildland fire protection.

Laws 1965, c. 190, § 3, p. 581;

Laws 1969, c. 286, § 3, p. 1055.